Utah, session 2026, HB354.
Section 1. Section 76-6-106.4 is enacted to read:76-6-106.4. Destroying, tampering with, or unlawfully interacting with rescue tracking equipment.(1)(a)As used in this section, "rescue tracking equipment" means property that:(i)is located in a public place; and(ii)is designed to allow an individual to take possession of an item, or take a similar action, that will:(A)notify law enforcement that the individual is in need of emergency assistance; and(B)assist law enforcement to track the location of the individual in order to render emergency assistance.(b)Terms defined in Sections 76-1-101.5 and 76-6-101 apply to this section.(2)An actor commits destroying, tampering with, or unlawfully interacting with rescue tracking equipment if the actor:(a)destroys rescue tracking equipment;(b)(i)damages, disables, removes, or tampers with rescue tracking equipment; and(ii)the conduct described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) inhibits or impedes the proper use or functioning of the rescue tracking equipment; or(c)interacts with a piece of rescue tracking equipment knowing that the action will result in a false report to a law enforcement agency of an individual who is in need of emergency assistance.(3)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.